Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5723.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:Property owned by a city is not subject to existing covenants, conditions, and restrictions of an airpark that are more restrictive than the zoning ordinance in the city.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:Property owned by a code city is not subject to existing covenants, conditions, and restrictions of an airpark that are more restrictive than the zoning ordinance in the code city.--- END ---